Louisiana, session 2026, SB59.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:324 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§324. Menhaden seines; restrictions
Anyone No person legally taking menhaden shall not have in their
possession more than five percent, by weight, of any species of fish other than
menhaden and herring-like species.